Utah, session 2026, HB96.
Section 1. Section 58-17b-508 is enacted to read:58-17b-508. Ivermectin -- Dispensing or selling without a prescription -- Exclusion from unlawful or unprofessional conduct.(1)As used in this section, "ivermectin" means the prescription anti-parasitic drug approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for use in humans.(2)Notwithstanding Section 58-17b-501, Section 58-17b-502, or any other provision of law, it is not unlawful or unprofessional conduct for a person licensed under this chapter to sell or dispense ivermectin:(a)to a person who does not have a prescription; and(b)without requiring consultation with a practitioner or any other health care provider.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.